Vermont, session 2025-2026, H338.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 1344 is amended to read:
§ 1344. DISQUALIFICATIONS
(a) An individual shall be disqualified for benefits:
* * *
(4) For any week with respect to which the Commissioner finds that the
individual’s total or partial unemployment is due to a stoppage of work that
exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment, or other
VT LEG #379393 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.338
2025 Page 2 of 3
premises at which the individual is or was last employed, provided that this
subdivision shall not apply if: except as otherwise provided by this subdivision
(4).
(A) No disqualification shall apply if the individual is not
participating in, or financing, or directly interested in the labor dispute that
caused the stoppage of work; or.
(B) No disqualification shall apply if the stoppage of work was due
solely to a lockout, effected by the employer in order to gain some concession
from employees. A lockout does not include a temporary suspension of work
in response to:
(i) actual or imminent damage to property of the employer; or
(ii) a purposeful effort by employees to reduce productivity.
(C) No disqualification shall apply after the first 14 days following
the commencement of unemployment due to a stoppage of work that exists
because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment, or other premises at
which the individual is or was last employed. This waiting period shall not
apply for any part of the 14-day period during which the individual’s employer
engages the services of a temporary or permanent replacement worker for the
individual’s position.
* * *
VT LEG #379393 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.338
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379393 v.1